Utah statutes.
67-19-19.   Political activity of employees -- Rules and regulations -- Highway patrol -- Hatch Act.

Except as otherwise provided by law or by rules promulgated under this section for federally aided programs, the following provisions apply with regard to political activity of career service employees in all grades and positions:

(1)  Career service employees may voluntarily participate in political activity subject to the following provisions:

(a)  if any career service employee is elected to any partisan or full-time nonpartisan political office, that employee shall be granted a leave of absence without pay for times when monetary compensation is received for service in political office;

(b)  no officer or employee in career service may engage in any political activity during the hours of employment, nor may any person solicit political contributions from employees of the executive branch during hours of employment for political purposes; and

(c)  partisan political activity may not be a basis for employment, promotion, demotion, or dismissal, except that the executive director shall adopt rules providing for the discipline or punishment of a state officer or employee who violates any provision of this section.

(2) (a)  Notwithstanding any other provision of this section, no member of the Utah Highway Patrol may use his official authority or influence for the purpose of interfering with an election or affecting the results of an election.

(b)  No person may induce or attempt to induce any member of the Utah Highway Patrol to participate in any activity prohibited by this Subsection (2).

(3)  Nothing contained in this section may be construed to:

(a)  preclude voluntary contributions by an employee to the party or candidate of the officer's or employee's choice; or

(b)  permit partisan political activity by any employee who is prevented or restricted from engaging in the political activity by the provisions of the federal Hatch Act.

